apertium-lin.lin.lexd
LEXICON V-VI-Stems
litukú:tukú     # "Abcess"
libenga:benga     # "Bag, purse, pocket"
linkɛké:nkɛké     # "Bamboo"
libumu:bumu     # "Stomach"
litíngbo:tíngbo     # "Bow"
libɛ́lɛ:bɛ́lɛ     # "Breast"
lisási:sási     # "Gun, cartridge"
libóbó:bóbó     # "Case(to sheath)"
lisanola:sanola     # "Comb"
lisanga:sanga     # "Beer, wine"
likoba:koba     # "Pillow"
lisbata:bata     # "Duck"
lifúlu:fúlu     # "Dust"
libɛngɛ́:bɛngɛ́     # "Potato(sweet)"
lilita:ta     # "Grave"
libeke:beke     # "Shoulder"
litambála:tambála     # "Scarf, towel, handkerchief"
lilelɛmbɛ́:lelɛmbɛ́     # "Hawk"
lilóngo:lóngo     # "Hip"
lidúsu:dúsu     # "Hole"
libula:bula     # "inheritance"
lisopɔ́:sopɔ́     # "intestine, entrail"
libeki:beki     # "Jar, pot"
lifúngola:fúngola     # "Key"
litongo:tongo     # "Knot"
litútu:tútu     # "Bruise, tumour"
litéya:téya     # "Sermon"
lingóla:ngóla     # "Mango"
libóngo:bóngo     # "Beach, shore"
libóndo:bóndo     # "Heap"
liyɛbu:yɛbu     # "Mushroom"
litungúlu:tungúlu     # "Onion"
lilála:lála     # "Orange(fruit)"
libanza:banza     # "Parable"
likáká:káká     # "Paw"
lilingí:ngí     # "Picture"
lingató:ngató     # "Crab"
likómbɔ́kɔ:kómbɔ́kɔ     # "Plane"
libáíya:báíya     # "Plank(wood)"
likémba:kémba     # "Banana, plantain"
lisalá:salá     # "Field, garden"
likabo:kabo     # "Portion"
likonjí:konjí     # "Post"
likonzi:konzi     # "Stake, pole"
lisasú:sasú     # "Saucepan"
litwáya:twáya     # "Serviette"
lingɔngɔ:ngɔngɔ     # "Sheet"
libobe:bobe     # "Spider"
likómbe:kómbe     # "Bachelor, single"
liziba:ziba     # "Spring"
litádi:tádi     # "Rock"
litámbí:támbí     # "Footprint, stride"
likololɔ:kololɔ     # "Toad"
likáíya:káíya     # "Tobacco"
likánga:kánga     # "Watch"
lipapú:papú     # "Wing"
libála:bála     # "Marriage"
libanda:banda      # "Outisde"
libángá:bángá     # "Pebble, stone"
libela:bela     # "Eternity, forever"
libóko:bóko     # "Fireplace"
libóndeli:bóndeli     # "Prayer"
libonza:bonza     # "Gift"
libóta:bóta     # "Family, lineage"
libulu:bulu     # "Hole, well"
lifuta:futa     # "Salary"
ligóródó:góródó     # "Toad"
likabo:kabo     # "Offering, gift"
likama:kama     # "Incident"
likambo:kambo     # "Case, problem"
likámwisi:kámwisi     # "Miracle"
likanisi:kanisi     # "Thought"
likí:kí     # "Egg"
likita:kita     # "Meeting, assembly, conspiracy"
likokí:kokí     # "The means, resources, the right"
likoló:koló     # "Sky, above"
liloki:loki     # "Demonology"
liloba:loba     # "Talk, speech (word)"
limemya:memya     # "Respect"
limpiká:mpiká     # "Worm"
limpúlututú     # "Spider"
lingolo:ngolo     # "Mango"
lingomba:ngomba     # "Community"
lino:no     # "Tooth"
lipa:pa     # "Bread"
lipandá:pandá     # "Independence"
lipata:pata     # "Cloud"
lisakoli:sakoli     # "Declaration"
lisálísí:sálísí     # "Help"
lisangá:sangá     # "Meeting"
lisángó:sángó     # "Corn"
lisapo:sapo     # "Tale"
lisúmu:súmu     # "Sin, crime"
lisungi:sungi     # "Aid"
litáma:táma     # "Cheek"
litéya:téya     # "Lesson"
litíti:títi     # "Grass'
litói:tói     # "Ear"
liwá:wá     # "Death"
liyebisi:yebisi     # "Press"
lizalí:zalí     # "Existence"
lininisa:ninisa     # "Window"
lisano:sano     # "Game"
lingómbá:ngómbá     # "(political) party"
litatoli:tatoli     # "Testimony"
likindo:kindo     # "Seminary(school)"
litámbwisi:támbwisi     # "Guidance"
linyɔ́kɔ:nyɔ́kɔ     # "Manioc"
lipása:pása     # "Twin"

LEXICON VI-Only-Stems
mabélé:bélé     # "Sand, earth"
mafúta:fúta     # "Oil"
malási:lási     # "Perfume"
máí:í     # "Water"
máyí:yí     # Dir/LR
makilá:kilá     # "Blood"
mambénga:mbénga     # "Equator"
masúwa:súwa     # "Ship"
mayɛ́lɛ:yɛ́lɛ     # "Intelligence"
mapɔnɔmi:pɔnɔmi     # "Voting season"
manáka:náka     # "Calendar"
mambí     # "Study"

LEXICON VII-VIII-Stems
elálelo:lálelo     # "Bedroom"
elémá:lémá     # "Mad, fool"
ekómo:kómo     # "Bracelet"
etápi:tápi     # "Branch(tree)"
ekango:kango     # "Bunch(bananas)"
ekútu:kútu     # "Pumpkin"
epásu:pásu     # "Chip"
etakoleli:takoleli     # "Custom house"
étónga:tónga     # "Flock"
elobélí:lobélí     # "Fishing rights"
étuka:tuka     # "Group, department"
etubeli:tubeli     # "Hammer"
etumbeli:tumbeli     # "Oven"
enkoti:nkoti     # "Cap, crown"
emekeli:mekeli     # "Ruler, measure"
ebakoleli:bakoleli     # "Nail puller"
elékéla:lekela     # "Passage, way"
etimeli:timeli     # "Pickaxe"
eyotoleli:yotoleli     # "Screwdriver"
esamba:samba     # "Shed(animal)"
esende:sende     # "Squirrel"
esaléli:saléli     # "Tool"
etuna:tuna     # "Tsete fly"
eyémbu:yémbu     # "Weed"
eyenga:yenga     # "Sunday, holiday, festival"
ekombeli:kombeli     # "Broom, brush"
ekangilu:kangilu     # "Parcel"
ebembe:bembe     # "Corpse"
ebumbeli:bumbeli     # "Cover"
embotu:mbotu     # "Fist"
eloli:loli     # "Flame"
engasa:ngasa     # "Fork"
etanda:tanda     # "Bench"
ebende:bendé     # "Metal"
engomeli     # "Iron"
ebóngá:bóngá     # "Seat"
esóngí:sóngí     # "Torch"
étɛ́kɛ:tɛ́kɛ     # "Eyelid"
elɛngɛ́     # "Young"
ejáleli:jáleli     # "Custom, habit"
elɛ́ngí:lɛ́ngí     # "Good(taste), sweet"
etombá:tombá     # "Morsel"
eboka:boka     # "Mortar"
ebimba:bimba     # "Package, bundle"
ekomélí:komélí     # "Pen, pencil"
ebengá:bengá     # "Pigeon, dove"
ekɔ́mbá:kɔ́mbá     # "Impotent(woman)"
esóbé:sóbé     # "Meadow, plain"
etálángu:tálángu     # "Scaffold"
elembo:lembo     # "Sign, symptom, seal, mark"
esakángo:sakángo     # "Shed"
ekoto:koto     # "Shoe"
elímo:límo     # "Spirit"
etáláká:táláká     # "Display"
ekúmbakɛ:kúmbakɛ     # "Storm"
etutú:tutú     # "Wall"
efelo:felo     # "Wall"
eyíká:yíká     # "Wheel"
ebale:bale     # "River"
ebandeli:bandeli     # "Beginning"
ebangá:bangá     # "Wave"
ebekú:bekú     # "Chin"
ebelo:belo     # "Thigh"
ekakoli:kakoli     # "Article"
ekelamo:kelamo  # "Living being"
ekila:kila     # "Abstinence"
eklézia:klézia     # "Church"
eklézia:klézya     #  Dir/LR
ekeléziya:keléziya     #  Dir/LR
ekelézia:kelézia     #  Dir/LR
ekólo:kólo     #"Measuring unit, country," depending on tone
ekomele:komele     # "Pencil"
elambá:lambá     # "Costume, dress, garment"
elanga:langa     # "Garden"
eleko:leko     # "Period, time, weather"
elikya:likya     # "Hope"
elóko:lóko     # "Thing, object"
elɔ́kɔ:lɔ́kɔ      # This is elóko in 7-vowel orthography. Included so that words with ɔ́ can tokenize properly
elongi:longi     # "Face"
engúmba:ngúmba     # "City"
epái:pái     # "Place, location"
esalelo:salelo     # "Work material"
esambiselo:sambiselo     # "Court"
esanga:sanga     # "Island, lake"
esɛngɔ:sɛngɔ     # "Happiness"
esíká:síká  # "Location, place, site, zone"
esóbé:sóbé     # "Savannah, desert"
esóngó:sóngó     # "Opposition"
etando:tando     # "Flat surface"
etápe:tápe     # "Branch"
etebu:tebu     # Unknown
eténi:téni     # "Piece, fragment"
etímá:tímá     # "Pond, lake"
etumba:tumba     # "Battle"
etúmbu:túmbu     # "Furnace, punishment"
eyano:yano     # "Answer"
eyékwelo:yékwelo     # "School"
ezaleli:zaleli     # "Conduct"
ezibele:zibele     # "Door, lid"
etúká:túká     # "Province"
ebengeli:bengeli     # "Telephone"
elenge:lenge     # "Youth"
epískɔ́pɔ:pískɔ́pɔ     # "Bishop"
esé:sé     # "Country"
efúku:fúku     # "Million"

LEXICON IX-X-Stems
#! take m
mángá     # "Mango"
mbálá     # "Tuber"
mbángá     # "Jaw"
mbele     # "Procelain"
mbelí     # "Knife"
mbíla     # "Palm tree"
mbóka     # "Village, country"
mbongo     # "Money"
mbótama     # "Birth"
mbóte     # "Greetings"
mbóto     # "Gamete"
mbúla     # "Rain, year"
mvúla     # "Rain, year"
mbuma     # "Fruit"
mémé     # "Sheep"
mesa     # "Table"
mpáku     # "Tax"
mói     # "Sun"
mweté     # "Tree"
mpanzi     # "Rib"
mokongo     # "Back(body)"
mukongo     # DIR/LR
mabendé     # Other way of writing "Metal"
mpɔndú     # "Cassave leaf"
mbólókó     # "Antelope"
mpɛ́pɔ     # "Plane"
mpiko     # "Endurance"
mbɛbú     # "Lip"
mpóko     # "Mouse"

#! take n
ndakisa     # "Example"
ndámbo     # "Part"
ndímo     # "Citrus fruit"
ndingisa     # "Authorization"
ndóto     # "Dream, hallucination"
ndúmba     # "Prostitute"
ndúnda     # "Vegetable"
ngámbo     # "The other side"
nganda     # "Bar, restaurant"
ngolu     # "Grace"
ngómbá     # "Mountain"
ngonga     # "Bell"
ngungi     # "Mosquito"
nguyá     # "Inner strength"
nkéma     # "Ape"
nkita     # "Economy, business"
nkoi     # "Leopard"
nkóli     # "Crocodile"
nkóna     # "Seed"
nkɔ́si     # "Lion"
ntáká     # "Miles" (more generally, distance)
ntambwe     # "Cheetah"
nyama     # "Animal, tapeworm"
nyaú     # "Cat"
nyoka     # "Snake"
nzala     # "Hunger"
nzélá     # "Street, road, opening"
nzémbo     # "Song"
nzeté     # "Tree, wood"
nzɔku     # "Elephant"
nzɔ́to     # "Body"
nkémbo     # "Glory"
ngúma     # "Python"
ngóla     # "Red"
nkunza     # "Hair"
ngɛngɛ     # "Poison"
nzinzi     # "Insect"
nkóto     # "Thousand"

#!! Never takes n/m
LEXICON IX-X-a-Stems
balé     # "Ball"
batísimo     # "Baptism"
bozó     # "Care"
búku     # "Book"
butú     # "Night"
bwátu     # "Dugout canoe, boat" (guessing this is class IX?)
fétí     # "Party"
kemi     # "Chemistry"
kosákosá     # "Shrimp"
kurúze     # "Cross"
maládi     # "Disease"
pálaki     # "Plate"
porte     # "Door"
sánzá     # "Moon, month"
sekelé     # "Secret"
séléká     # "In truth"
simetiere     # "Cemetary" (unsure if acutally class IX)
sukáli     # "Sugar"
vile     # "City"
víno     # "Wine"
víno:vinu     # "Wine" Dir/LR
zélo     # "Sand"
ndɛkɛ     # "Bird"
zuluná     # "Newspaper"
komíni     # "Communes"
sapáto     # "Shoe"
afabɛ́     # "Alphabet"
dyosɛ́zi     # "Diocese"
mángwɛlɛ́     # "Vaccine"
zemi     # "Pregnancy"
zándo     # "Market"
kɔ́ngɔ     # "Congo"
klísto     # "Christian"

#!! Can take n/m or not
LEXICON IX-X-b-Stems
#! Can take m or not
mpámba:pámba     # "Nothing"
mpási:pási     # "Suffering"
mpembéni:pembéni     # "Close"
mpókwa:pókwa     # "Twilight, evening"
mpongí:pongí     # "Sleep"
mpósá:pósá     # "Envy"
mpúnda:púnda     # "Horse"
mbulamatari:bulamatari     # "Government"
mpúku:púku     # "Rat"

#! Can take n or not
nkándá:kándá     # "Anger"
nkáké:káké     # "Thunder"
nkímyá:kímyá     # "Calm"
nkímyá:kimia     # "Calm" Dir/LR
nkínga:kínga     # "Bicycle"
nkómbó:kómbó     # "Name"
nsangó:sangó     # "Information"
nsima:sima     # "Behind" (often followed by na for preposition-like usage)
nsé:sé     # "The ground"
nsinga:singa     # "Wire"
nsómo:sómo     # "Terror"
nsóni:sóni     # "Shame"
nsúka:súka     # "Target, end"
ntálo:tálo     # "Number"
ntángo:tángo     # "Time"
ntóngó:tóngó     # "Morning"
ntína:tína     # "Reason, cause"
ntembe:tembe     # "Doubt"
ntolí:tolí     # "Advice"
ntólo:tólo     # "Torso"
nzámba:zámba     # "Forest"
nkíngó:kíngó     # "Neck"
nkíngá:kíngá     # "Bike"
ntángawisi:tángawisi     # "Ginger"
nkóló:kóló     # "Owner, Lord"
nkɔ́kɔ:kɔ́kɔ     # "Ancestor"

LEXICON XI-VI-Stems
lobebo:bebo     # "Lip"
lobíko:bíko     # "Life, existence"
lobɔ́kɔ:bɔ́kɔ     # "Arm, hand"
lofundu:fundu     # "Vanity"
lokásá:kásá     # "Leaf, page"
lokolo:kolo     # "Foot, leg"
lokúmu:kúmu     # "Glory, honor, respect"
lokutá:kutá     # "Lie"
lóla:la     # "Paradise"
loléndo:léndo     # "Pride"
loléngé:léngé     # "Method"
londende:ndende     # Translated waves, not sure if this is actually class XI but the prefix matches...
lopángo:pángo     # "Residential parcel"
loposo:poso     # "Skin"
lomposo:mposo     # "Skin"
loyémbo:yémbo     # "Song"
lombú:mbú     # "Sea, ocean"
